District of Columbia statutes.
16-1121

Judgment and writ of possession after payment for improvements.

When the plaintiff pays to the defendant, within the time fixed therefor by the court, or, in case of the defendant’s refusal to accept the payment, pays into court for the defendant’s use the amount of the excess of the value of the improvements over the damages of the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be entitled forthwith to a judgment and writ of possession.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1121.
1973 Ed., § 16-1121.